Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB330.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Data center" means a facility or group of facilities engaged in the primary
services of storing, managing, transporting, and processing digital data;
including but not limited to:
1. Computer and network systems, including associated components
such as servers, network equipment and appliances,
telecommunications systems, and data storage systems;
2. Systems for monitoring and managing infrastructure performance;
3. Internet-related equipment and services;
4. Data communications connections;
5. Environmental controls;
6. Cooling systems;
7. Power generation systems;
8. Auxiliary buildings;
9. Fire protection systems;
10. Security systems and services; and
11. Any supporting infrastructure;
(b) "Nondisclosure or confidentiality agreement" means an agreement or
contract that includes a provision or clause that prohibits a party from
disclosing, discussing, describing, or commenting on the agreement or its
terms beyond protections authorized by statute; and
(c) "Public agency" has the same meaning as in KRS 61.870.
(2) (a) A public agency shall not enter into a nondisclosure or confidentiality
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/27/2026 2:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2278
agreement relating to a data center that expands confidentiality beyond
what is authorized by the Kentucky Revised Statutes.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for any contract
relating to the potential or actual development, siting, construction, or
operation of a data center entered into after the effective date of this Act,
any contractual provision that purports to waive, supersede, or expand the
requirements of the Kentucky Open Records Act pursuant KRS 61.870 to
61.884 or the Kentucky Open Meetings Act pursuant to KRS 61.805 to
61.850 shall be void as contrary to public policy.
(3) (a) Upon the execution of a data center siting or development agreement, the
issuance of a permit relating to the siting, construction, or operation of a
data center by a public agency, the approval of a special electric utility rate
applicable to data centers by the Public Service Commission or a municipal
utility, or a final public agency action approving a data center project, the
following information shall be made available to the public and shall not be
deemed confidential:
1. The identity of the data center owner or operator;
2. The project location;
3. The total amount and type of public financial incentives or tax
benefits that the data center has received or is eligible to receive in the
future;
4. Any public financial contribution toward infrastructure to serve the
data center;
5. Projected and actual aggregate electricity demand, including peak
load estimates for the data center;
6. Projected and actual aggregate water withdrawal, consumption, and
wastewater discharge for the data center;
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/27/2026 2:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2278
7. Required generation, transmission, distribution, water, or wastewater
infrastructure upgrades needed to serve the data center;
8. Any commitments related to environmental mitigation or resource
efficiency to which the data center has agreed; and
9. Enforcement or claw back provisions for incentives or benefits
received by the data center in the event that the data center fails to
meet any of its legal obligations or requirements.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall require the disclosure of a trade secret as
defined in KRS 365.880.
(4) (a) Aggregated data concerning projected or actual impacts on the following
shall not be deemed confidential solely because the information relates to a
data center project:
1. Electric utility rates;
2. Water or wastewater utility rates;
3. Electric grid reliability;
4. Potential pollution discharge types and amounts;
5. Public infrastructure capacity; or
6. Public expenditures.
(b) This subsection shall not require disclosure of proprietary technical
specifications, cybersecurity systems, or internal operational designs.
(5) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a nondisclosure or
confidentiality agreement or confidentiality designation entered into after the
effective date of this Act shall not restrict:
(a) The authority of local elected officials, utility boards, or regulatory agencies
to publicly discuss or deliberate data center impacts on infrastructure,
environmental impacts, or utility rates; or
(b) Public participation, hearings, or proceedings otherwise required by law.
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/27/2026 2:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2278
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter or limit any provision contained
in KRS Chapter 278, 61.810(1)(g), 61.878(1)(c), or 365.880.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/27/2026 2:24 PM Jacketed